Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2003
Department; duties.

The department shall constitute the sole agency of the state for the purpose of (1) making an inventory of existing hospitals, surveying the need for construction of hospitals, and developing a program of hospital construction as provided in section 71-2007, and (2) developing and administering a state plan for the construction of public and other nonprofit hospitals as provided in the State Hospital Survey and Construction Act.

Laws 1947, c. 232, § 3, p. 734;

Laws 1965, c. 421, § 2, p. 1350;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 594;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 179;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 508.